North Dakota, session 69, SB2214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 6-01-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4. The commissioner may furnish information and enter sharing agreements as to matters of
mutual interest to an official or examiner of the federal reserve system, federal deposit
insurance corporation, federal home loan bank board, national credit union administration,
office of thrift supervision, comptroller of the currency, any other federal government agency,
insurance commissioner, office of the securities commissioner, regulatory trade associations,
any state bank or credit union supervisors or supervisors of other licensed entities of other
states, or a nationwide multistate licensing system.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsections 4 and 5 of section 10-04-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
4. "Commissioner" means the securitiesinsurance commissioner of this state.
5. "Department" means the state securitiesinsurance department.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 10-04-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
10-04-03. Administration of chapter.
1. The state securities department is under the supervision of a chief officer designated as the
securities commissioner. The securities commissioner must be appointed by the governor and
confirmed by the senate and shall hold office for a term of four years, beginning on the first
day of July following a national presidential election and continuing until a successor has been
appointed, confirmed by the senate, and has qualified, unless removed as herein provided. If
the senate is not in session, the governor may make an interim appointment, and the interim
appointee may hold office until the senate confirms or rejects the appointment. The
commissioner may not own or control any security required to be registered under this
chapter, or any security which is exempt based on the approval of the securities department.
The commissioner may not be an officer, director, or employee of any broker-dealer, agent,
investment adviser, or investment adviser representative required to be registered under this
chapter, or of a federal covered adviser required to be notice-filed under this chapter. The
governor may remove from office any commissioner who fails to discharge faithfully the duties
of office or who becomes disqualified under the provisions of this section.

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 2
a. It is the prime duty of the commissioner to administer the provisions of this chapter. The
commissioner shall receive a salary within the amount appropriated for salaries by the
legislative assembly. The commissioner shall use a seal with the words "securities
commissioner, North Dakota" and such design as the commissioner may prescribe
engraved thereon by which seal the commissioner may authenticate documents used in
the administration of this chapter.
b. The commissioner may employ such employees as are necessary for the administration
of this chapter. In the absence or disability of the commissioner, the deputy or designee
of the commissioner may administer the provisions of this chapter as acting
commissioner.
c. The commissioner may not:
(1) Own or control any security required to be registered under this chapter or any
security that is exempt based on the approval of the department; or
(2) Be an officer, director, or employee of any broker - dealer, agent, investment adviser ,
or investment adviser representative required to be registered under this chapter, or
of a federal covered adviser required to be notice - filed under this chapter .
2. The commissioner shall have authority to administermay:
a. Administer oaths in, and to prescribe forms for, all matters arising under this chapter. The
commissioner may from time to time make,; and
b. Adopt, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary under this
chapter, including rules and forms governing registration statements, applications and
reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this chapter, if the definitions are
consistent with this chapter.
3. The commissioner shall cooperate with the administrators of the securities laws of other states
and of the United States with a view toward achieving maximum uniformity in the interpretation
of like provisions of the laws administered by them and in the forms which are required to be
filed under such law.
3. In addition to their regular compensation, the commissioner and the commissioner's
employees shall be paid travel expenses necessary and actually incurred in the performance
of their duties.
4. a. A special fund is established in the state treasury and designated as the investor
education and technology fund. The commissioner may deposit the following moneys into
the investor education and technology fund:
a. (1) Payments for tuition or other costs associated with educational services or materials
provided by the department.
b. (2) Grants or donations for the purpose of investor education received by the
commissioner from any public or private source.
c. (3) Civil penalties assessed by the commissioner under the Securities Act of 1951, if
the commissioner finds thatthe violations or alleged violations underlying the
assessment of civil penalties:
(1) The violations or alleged violations underlying the assessment of civil penalties
involve
(a) Involve repeat violations, involve numerous investors, or appear to have been
perpetrated on a systematic basis; and

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 3
(2) The violations or alleged violations underlying the assessment of civil penalties
could
(b) Could have been prevented or significantly curtailed had the individual
investors involved in the matter been more knowledgeable about financial
concepts in general, or about any specific laws, practices, or procedures
relating to the securities industry.
b. The commissioner shall maintain and administer the investor education and technology
fund. The moneys in the fund are appropriated to provide education services to the public
relating to any of the financial services industries, including the securities industry, and to
provide for the technology needs of the department, including the purchase or rental of
equipment or software, servicing of the equipment or software, and training the
commissioner's staff in the use of the equipment or software.
5. A special fund is established in the state treasury and designated as the securities department
special fund. All fees, civil penalties, or other moneys collected under this chapter must be
deposited in the securities department special fund, except funds permitted to be deposited
into the investor education and technology fund under subsection 4 or civil penalties collected
from enforcement actions for the purpose of distribution to aggrieved investors, which may be
deposited in the investor restitution fund. Funds in the investor restitution fund are
appropriated to the securities commissioner on a continuing basis for distribution to aggrieved
investors.
a. The moneys deposited in the securities department special fund are reserved for use by
the securities departmentcommissioner to defray the expenses of the department in the
discharge of administrative and regulatory powers and duties of the department as
prescribed by lawunder this chapter. Deposits under this subdivision are subject to the
applicable laws relating to the appropriations of state funds and to the deposit and
expenditure of state moneys. The securities commissioner is responsible for the proper
expenditure of these moneys as provided by law.
b. The office of management and budget shall transfer any balance in the securities
department special fund in excess of the amounts necessary for department
expenditures pursuant to the department's biennial appropriation to the general
fund.Except as otherwise provided by law, after the fiscal year has been closed and all
expenses relating to the fiscal year have been accounted for, the office of management
and budget shall transfer any balance remaining in the securities special fund that
exceeds one million dollars to the general fund.
6. The commissioner may honor requests from interested persons for the issuance of a
statement or opinion concerning the applicability of this chapter or the rules adopted under this
chapter to any transaction or proposed transaction whichthat may be subject to this chapter.
Any such request must be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of one hundred fifty dollars.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 10-04-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
10-04-16. Orders, injunctions, and prosecutions for violations - Civil penalty.
If it appears to the commissioner, either upon complaint or otherwise, that any person has engaged
in, or is engaging in, or is about to engage in any act or practice or transaction that is prohibited by this
chapter or by any order of the commissioner issued under this chapter or which is declared to be illegal
inunder this chapter, the commissioner may:
1. Issue any order, including cease and desist, rescission, stop, and suspension orders, which
the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of
investors. An order of the commissioner is effective upon issuance. The commissioner may, in

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 4
addition to any other remedy authorized by this chapter, impose by order and collect a civil
penalty against any person found in an administrative action to have violated any provision of
this chapter, or any rule or order adopted or issued under this chapter, in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation. The commissioner may bring actions to
recover penalties pursuant to this section in district court. A person aggrieved by an order
issued pursuant to this subsection may request a hearing before the commissioner if a written
request is made within fifteen days after receipt of the order. If a request for hearing is made
under this subsection, the commissioner shall schedule a hearing within a reasonable time.
Subsections 3 and 4 of section 10-04-12 apply to any hearing conducted under this
subsection. If, after a hearing, the commissioner sustains an order previously issued, the
sustaining order is subject to appeal to the district court of Burleigh County according to the
procedures set forth in chapter 28-32. Any order issued under this subsection is a final order if
it is properly served and no hearing was requested within the required timeline. If an order
issued under this subsection is sustained or modified after a hearing held in accordance with
section 10-04-12, the order sustaining or modifying that order is a final order. If the final order
is not appealed in accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 28-32 or if the final
order is sustained on appeal, the securities departmentcommissioner may file a certified copy
of the final order with the clerk of a court of competent jurisdiction. The order so filed has the
same effect as a judgment of the court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in the
same manner as a judgment of the court.
2. Apply to the district court of any county in this state for an injunction restraining the person and
the person's agents, employees, partners, officers, and directors from continuing the act,
practice, or transaction or engaging thereinin or doing any acts in furtherance thereofthat
further the practice or transaction, and for such other and further relief as the facts warrant. In
any proceeding for an injunction, the commissioner may apply for and on due showing be
issued the court's subpoena requiring the appearance forthwith of any defendant and the
defendant's agents, employees, partners, officers, or directors, and the production of the
documents, books, and records necessary for the hearing upon the petition for an injunction.
Upon proof of any of the offenses described in this section, the court may grant the injunction
as the facts warrant, and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the
defendant's assets, and the court may assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten
thousand dollars for each violation of this chapter, and any rules promulgated
thereunderadopted or orders issued thereunderunder this chapter. The court shallmay not
require the commissioner to post a bond.
3. Refer any evidence available concerning the act, practice, or transaction to the appropriate
criminal prosecutor who may, with or without the reference, institute the necessary criminal
proceedings. The prosecutor may apply for and on due showing be issued the court's
subpoena requiring the appearance forthwith of any defendant and the defendant's agents,
employees, partners, officers, and directors, and the production of any documents, books, and
records necessary for the prosecution of the criminal proceedings.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 10-04-16.1 of
the North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
(2) NoA person is not liable to a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal
covered adviser, or investment adviser representative for defamation relating to a
statement that is contained in a record required or requested by the securities
department pursuant tounder this subsection or required to be maintained under
section 10-04-10.3, unless the person knew, or should have known at the time the
statement was made, that it was false in a material respect or the person acted in
reckless disregard of the statement's truth or falsity.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-06-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 5
26.1-06-12. Securities laws.
This chapter does not limit or modify in any way any responsibility, authority, power, or jurisdiction of
the securities commissioner or ofprovided in the securities laws of this state.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 43-10.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. "Commissioner" means the securitiesinsurance commissioner.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 43-23.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. Unless the method of disposition is adopted for the purpose of evasion of this chapter, the
registration provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
a. Offers and dispositions of securities currently registered with the North Dakota securities
commissionerinsurance department;
b. A subdivision as to which the plan of disposition is to dispose to ten or fewer persons; or
c. A subdivision as to which the commission has granted an exemption as provided in
section 43-23.1-11.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 51-19-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4. "Commissioner" means the securitiesinsurance commissioner.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 51-23-02 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. "Commissioner" means the securitiesinsurance commissioner of this state.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 51-23-15 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. This chapter must be administered by the securitiesinsurance commissioner.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-12-08 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. After consultation with the head of the state department or institution or with the state board,
commission, committee, or agency affected, the attorney general may appoint assistant or
special assistant attorneys general to represent the state board, commission, committee, or
agency. A state officer, head of any state department, whether elected or appointed, or state
department, board, commission, committee, or agency may not employ legal counsel, and no
person maya person may not act as legal counsel in any matter, action, or proceeding in
which the state or any state department, board, commission, committee, or agency is
interested or is a party, except upon written appointment by the attorney general. Workforce
safety and insurance, the department of transportation, the state tax commissioner, the public
service commission, the insurance commissioner, and the agriculture commissioner, and the
securities commissioner may employ attorneys to represent them. These entities shall pay the
salaries and expenses of the attorneys they employ within the limits of legislative
appropriations. The attorneys that represent these entities must be special assistant attorneys
general appointed by the attorney general pursuant to this section. Absent good cause, the
attorney general shall appoint as special assistant attorneys general licensed attorneys
selected by these entities. The attorney general may revoke the appointment only for good

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 6
cause or upon the request of the entity. Good cause means an inadequate level of experience,
competence, or ethical standards.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-59-22.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The following state agencies shall obtain centralized desktop support services from the
information technology department:
a. Office of administrative hearings.
b. Office of the governor.
c. Commission on legal counsel for indigents.
d. Public employees retirement system.
e. North Dakota university system office.
f. Department of career and technical education.
g. Department of financial institutions.
h. Department of veterans' affairs.
i. Aeronautics commission.
j. Council on the arts.
k. Agriculture commissioner.
l. Department of labor and human rights.
m. Indian affairs commission.
n. Protection and advocacy project.
o. Secretary of state.
p. State treasurer.
q. State auditor.
r. Securities department.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 57-38.5-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. "Qualified business" means a business other than a real estate investment trust which is a
primary sector business that:
a. Is incorporated or its satellite operation is incorporated as a for-profit corporation,
passthrough entity, or joint venture;
b. Is in compliance with the requirements for filings with the securitiesinsurance
commissioner under the securities laws of this state;
c. Has North Dakota residents as a majority of its employees in the North Dakota principal
office or the North Dakota satellite operation;

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 7
d. Has its principal office in this state and has the majority of its business activity performed
in this state, except sales activity, or has a significant operation in North Dakota that has
or is projected to have more than ten employees or one hundred fifty thousand dollars of
sales annually; and
e. Relies on innovation, research, or the development of new products and processes in its
plans for growth and profitability.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 57-38.6-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. "Qualified business" means a cooperative, corporation, partnership, or limited liability
company that:
a. Is incorporated or organized in this state after December 31, 2000, for the primary
purpose of being an agricultural commodity processing facility;
b. Has been certified by the securitiesinsurance commissioner to be in compliance under
the securities laws of this state; and
c. Has an agricultural commodity processing facility, or intends to locate one, in this state.
SECTION 16. TRANSFER. The office of management and budget shall transfer any amounts and
full-time equivalent positions appropriated or authorized for the securities department to the insurance
commissioner, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 17. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 18. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2214 - PAGE 8
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2214 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 40 Nays 6 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 1 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State